Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.665

Washington scholars award waivers or grants—Transfers between colleges and universities.

Students receiving grants under RCW 28B.76.660 or waivers under *RCW 28B.15.543 are entitled to transfer among in-state public and independent colleges or universities and to continue to receive award benefits, as provided in this section, in the form of a grant or waiver of tuition and services and activities fees while enrolled at such institutions during the period of eligibility. The total grants or waivers for any one student shall not exceed twelve quarters or eight semesters of undergraduate study.

(1) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may transfer between in-state public institutions, or from an eligible independent college or university to an in-state public institution of higher education, and are entitled to receive the waiver of tuition and services and activities fees.

(2) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may transfer from an in-state public institution to an eligible independent college or university, or between eligible independent colleges or universities, and continue to receive a grant contingent upon available funding.

(3) Scholars named to the award after June 30, 1994, may transfer among in-state public or private colleges and universities and continue to receive the grant contingent upon available funding.

(4) In addition, scholars who transfer to an eligible independent institution may receive the grant contingent upon the agreement of the school to match on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the student from the state.

[ 2004 c 275 s 25; 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 4; 1988 c 210 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.80.246.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.15.543 was amended by 2015 c 55 s 219, changing tuition waivers to grants for undergraduate coursework.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 5: See notes following RCW 28A.600.130.